Utah statutes.
53-8-107.   Cooperation with other officers.

To secure information in order to achieve greater success in prevention and detection of crime and apprehension of criminals, the Highway Patrol shall cooperate and exchange information with:

(1)  any other departments of the state;

(2)  other law enforcement agencies, both within and outside this state; and

(3)  federal law enforcement agencies.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

